District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

16-4311

Vacating an award.

Repealed.

Apr. 7, 1977, D.C. Law 1-117, § 12, 23 DCR 9690
Sept. 6, 1980, D.C. Law 3-85, § 2(a), (c), 27 DCR 2900
Feb. 27, 2008, D.C. Law 17-111, § 3, 55 DCR 1847
1981 Ed., § 16-4311.
1973 Ed., T. 16, Appx., § 12.

Repeal of Uniform Arbitration Act: D.C. Law 17-111, § 3, Feb. 27, 2008, 55 DCR 1847, provided: “Effective July 1, 2009, Chapter 43 of Title 16 of the District of Columbia Official Code is repealed.”

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 12 of the Uniform Arbitration Act.